dictsource/ca_rules
        // cross-accent adaptations
?2       è (s_      ''e  // final "ès" is pronounced "és" in western accents (francès)
?2       è (n_      ''e  // final "èn" is pronounced "én" in western accents (francès)
?2       è (_       ''e  // final "è" is pronounced "é" in western accents (francès)
?2       è (ixer_   ''e
?2       è (ncer_   ''e
?2       è (nyer_   ''e
?2       è (iem_    ''e
?2       è (ieu_    ''e
?2       è ($w_alt1++    ''e

?1       é (ncer_   ''E
?1       é (nyer_   ''E
?1       é (iem_    ''E
?1       é (ieu_    ''E

?6       è (s_      ''e  // final "ès" is pronounced "és" in rossellonese accents (francès)
?6       è (n_      ''e  // final "èn" is pronounced "én" in rossellonese accents (francès)

?6       à (Cic_    a   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       à (Cica_   a   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       à (Cics_   a   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       à (Ciques_ a   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       è (Cic_    e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       è (Cica_   e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       è (Cics_   e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       è (Ciques_ e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       é (Cic_    e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       é (Cica_   e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       é (Cics_   e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       é (Ciques_ e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ú (Cic_    u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ú (Cica_   u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ú (Cics_   u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ú (Ciques_ u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       í (Cic_    i   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       í (Cica_   i   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       í (Cics_   i   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       í (Ciques_ i   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ó (Cic_    o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ó (Cica_   o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ó (Cics_   o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ó (Ciques_ o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ò (CCic_    o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ò (CCica_   o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ò (CCics_   o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ò (CCiques_ o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       à (CCic_    a   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       à (CCica_   a   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       à (CCics_   a   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       à (CCiques_ a   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       è (CCic_    e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       è (CCica_   e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       è (CCics_   e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       è (CCiques_ e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       é (CCic_    e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       é (CCica_   e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       é (CCics_   e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       é (CCiques_ e   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ú (CCic_    u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ú (CCica_   u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ú (CCics_   u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ú (CCiques_ u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       í (CCic_    i   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       í (CCica_   i   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       í (CCics_   i   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       í (CCiques_ i   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ó (CCic_    o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ó (CCica_   o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ó (CCics_   o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ó (CCiques_ o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ò (CCic_    o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ò (CCica_   o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ò (CCics_   o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ò (CCiques_ o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ò (fil_     o   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6       ò (fils_    o   // avoid esdrúixoles


.group '
         'n (_S2t    n
         'm (_S2t    m
         't (_S2t    t
         'l (_S2t    l
         's (_S2t    s
         'ns (_S3t   ns
         'us (_S3t   us
      A) 'us (_S3t   ws
         'ls (_S3t   ls
?5       'ls (_S3t   lts
